California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), solely for the 2009–10 fiscal year, the amount of funds transferred shall be reduced by six million one hundred and ninety-one thousand dollars ($6,191,000). The funds generated from this reduction shall be transferred to the General Fund.

(f) No distributions, payments, transfers, or disbursements shall be made from the prior supplemental funds except as set forth in this section.

(g) Moneys in the fund shall be used as the source for the nonfederal share of payments to hospitals under this section.

(h) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (j), moneys shall be
 applied to obtain federal financial participation to the extent available in accordance with customary Medi-Cal accounting procedures for purposes of payments under this section. Distributions from the fund shall be supplemental to any other Medi-Cal reimbursement received by the hospitals, including amounts that hospitals receive under the selective provider contracting program, and shall not affect provider rates paid under the selective provider contracting program.

(i) Subject to subdivision (j), all amounts that are in the fund shall be available for negotiation by the California Medical Assistance Commission, along with corresponding federal financial participation, for additional payments to distressed hospitals. These amounts shall be paid under contracts entered into by the department and negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), provided that any amounts payable
 to a designated public hospital shall be paid in the form of a direct grant of state general funds pursuant to a contract negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission. The commission shall not consider the lack of federal financial participation in direct grants to designated public hospitals in determining which hospital may receive funding under this section.

(j) After April 1, 2007, and each April 1 thereafter, in the event that funding under this article is insufficient to meet the adjusted aggregate baseline funding amounts for a particular project year, as determined in subdivision (d) of Section 14166.5, and in Sections 14166.13 and 14166.18, funds under this section shall first be available for use under contracts negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission for hospitals contracting under the selective provider contracting program under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081) in an effort to address the
 insufficiency, to the extent funds under this section are available on or after April 1 for the particular project year.

(k) Any funds remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall be carried forward for use in the following fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 49.   Effective July 28, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.24.

(a) Any determination of the amount due a designated public hospital that is based in whole or in part on costs reported to or audited by a Medicare fiscal intermediary shall not be deemed final for purposes of this article unless the hospital has received a final determination of Medicare payment for the cost reporting for Medicare purposes. Designated public hospitals shall be entitled to pursue
 all administrative and judicial review available under the Medicare Program and any final determination shall be incorporated into the department’s final determination of payment due the hospital under this article.

(b) If as a result of an audit performed by the department or any state or federal agency, the department determines that any hospital has been overpaid under the demonstration project or the successor demonstration project, the department shall recoup the overpayment in accordance with Section 14172.5 or 14115.5. The hospital may appeal the overpayment determinations and any related audit determination in accordance with the appeal procedures set forth in Sections 51016 to 51047, inclusive, of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations. The hospital may seek judicial review of the final administrative decision as set forth in Section 14171.

(c) The department
 shall promptly consult with the affected governmental entity regarding a dispute between a designated public hospital and the department regarding the validity of the hospital’s certified public expenditures. If the department determines that the hospital’s certification is valid, the department shall submit the claim to obtain federal reimbursement for the certified expenditure in question.

(d) (1) Upon receipt of a notice of disallowance or deferral from the federal government related to the certified public expenditures or intergovernmental transfers of any governmental entity participating in the demonstration project, the department shall promptly notify the affected governmental entity. The governmental entity that certified the public expenditure shall be the entity responsible for the federal portion of that expenditure.

(2) The department and the
 affected governmental entity shall promptly consult regarding the proposed disallowance or deferral.

(3) After consulting with the governmental entity, the department shall determine whether the disallowance or response to a deferral should be filed with the federal government. If the department determines the appeal or response has merit, the department shall timely appeal. If necessary, the department may request an extension of the deadline to file an appeal or response to a deferral. The affected governmental entity may provide the department with the legal and factual basis for the appeal or response.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the department has exercised the authority set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 14166.221 and subdivision (e) of Section 14167.5, then all of the following shall occur:

(1) (A) The state shall be solely responsible for the repayment of the federal portion of any federal disallowance associated with any certified public expenditures for the 2009, 2010, and 2011 project years through October 31, 2010, and paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 14166.24 shall be disregarded, up to the total amount of the grant funds retained by the state under subdivision (e) of Section 14167.5.

(B) If the hospitals have additional certified public expenditures for which federal funds have not been received but for which federal funds could have been received under the demonstration project had additional federal funds been available, including federal funds made available under an extension of the demonstration project, the state shall first be allowed to respond to a deferral or disallowance based on the certified public expenditures of designated public hospitals, or the governmental
 entities with which they are affiliated, by substituting the additional certified public expenditures for those deferred or disallowed.

(2) The department shall not recoup any overpayment from a designated public hospital, or a governmental entity with which it is affiliated, with respect to payments under this article for the 2009, 2010, and 2011 project years through October 31, 2010, until the state has repaid all federal funds due up to the amount of the grant funds retained by the state under subdivision (e) of Section 14167.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 17.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.25.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) In light of the closure of Los Angeles County Martin Luther King, Jr.-Harbor Hospital, there is a need to ensure adequate funding for continued health care services to the uninsured population of South Los Angeles, including, but not limited to, the Cities of Compton,
 Lynwood, South Gate, and Huntington Park, the southern and central portions of the Cities of Los Angeles, Inglewood, Gardena, and surrounding unincorporated communities.

(2) The state, the County of Los Angeles, and all health care providers in the South Los Angeles community must work together to meet the health care needs of the community until the critical hospital services previously provided by Los Angeles County Martin Luther King, Jr.-Harbor Hospital can be restored at this location.

(3) The Medi-Cal Hospital/Uninsured Care Demonstration Project provides a critical source of funding for services to low-income communities throughout the state that are provided by California’s safety net hospital systems.

(4) The special funding provided in this section is predicated on the express intent of the County of Los
 Angeles to restore hospital services on the hospital campus, to be operated by either a private or public entity. The county has undertaken a specific plan to do so as quickly as possible.

(5) The Legislature anticipates that demonstration project funds will be available to help fund the reopened hospital. The nature and amount of that funding cannot be determined until the new structure and operation of the hospital is known.

(6) As an interim response to the specific circumstances caused by the closure of this hospital, and until hospital services can be restored at this location, a special fund will be created to receive demonstration project funding to be available to the County of Los Angeles for expenditures to preserve health care services for the uninsured population of South Los Angeles, as defined above.

(b) The South Los Angeles Medical Services Preservation Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the department for the purposes specified in this section.

(c) Subject to the conditions in this section, a maximum amount of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of the safety net care pool funds claimed and received by the state that are based on the certified public expenditures of the County of Los Angeles or its designated public hospitals shall be transferred to the South Los Angeles Medical Services Preservation Fund for each of the three project years, 2007–08, 2008–09, and 2009–10.

(1) In the event that the director determines that any amount is due to the County of Los Angeles under the demonstration project for services rendered during the portion of a
 project year during which Los Angeles County Martin Luther King, Jr.-Harbor Hospital was operational, the amount deposited in the fund under this subdivision shall be reduced by a percentage determined by reducing 100 percent by the percentage reduction in the hospital’s baseline as determined under subdivision (c) of Section 14166.5 for that project year.

(2) If, in the aggregate, the federal medical assistance percentage of the certified public expenditures reported by the County of Los Angeles and its designated public hospitals under Section 14166.8, excluding those certified public expenditures reported under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.8, in any project year do not exceed the amounts paid or payable to the county and its designated public hospitals in the aggregate under Section 14166.6, excluding disproportionate share payments funded with intergovernmental transfers, Section 14166.7, and subdivision (d) for the
 same project year, then the amount deposited in the fund under subdivision (c) shall be reduced by the amount of excess payments over the federal medical assistance percentage of certified public expenditures.

(d) Moneys in the South Los Angeles Medical Services Preservation Fund shall be distributed to the County of Los Angeles in amounts equal to the costs incurred by the county, including indirect costs associated with adequately maintaining the hospital building so that it can be reopened, in providing, or compensating other providers for, health services rendered to the uninsured population of South Los Angeles, including all of the following:

(1) Services provided in the multiservice ambulatory care center operating on the former Los Angeles County Martin Luther King, Jr.-Harbor Hospital campus.

(2) Services
 rendered to patients in beds at other designated public hospitals operated by the County of Los Angeles that have been opened specifically for the purpose of serving patients that would have been served by the former Los Angeles County Martin Luther King, Jr.-Harbor Hospital.

(3) Services rendered in the county-operated health center and the comprehensive health center formerly operated under Los Angeles County Martin Luther King, Jr.-Harbor Hospital.

(4) Services rendered to the uninsured by other public or private health care providers for which the County of Los Angeles has agreed to pay under a contract with the provider as a result of the downsizing or closure of Los Angeles County Martin Luther King, Jr.-Harbor Hospital.

(e) As a condition for receiving distributions from the South Los Angeles Medical Services
 Preservation Fund in any project year, the County of Los Angeles shall assure the director that it will not reduce the county’s ongoing, systemwide financial contribution to the county department of health services during that project year for health care services to the uninsured.

(f) No funds shall be available from the South Los Angeles Medical Services Preservation Fund for services rendered when a hospital on the former Los Angeles County Martin Luther King, Jr.-Harbor Hospital campus is certified for Medi-Cal participation.

(g) If the full amount of the South Los Angeles Medical Services Preservation Fund for any project year is not distributed to the County of Los Angeles, based on the cost of services identified in subdivision (d) that were rendered during that project year, any remaining amounts shall revert to the Health Care Support Fund established pursuant to Section
 14166.21.

(h) To the extent that the County of Los Angeles receives distributions from the South Los Angeles Medical Services Preservation Fund based on the cost of services rendered by county-operated providers, or based on payments made to private providers for services rendered to the uninsured population of South Los Angeles, the costs of the services rendered shall not be considered for purposes of any of the following determinations with respect to either the county or the private provider:

(1) Medi-Cal payments under the selective provider contracting program under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), including payments to distressed hospitals under Section 14166.23.

(2) Baseline amounts, or adjustments thereto, under Section 14166.5, 14166.13, or 14166.18.

(3) Any other payment under Medi-Cal or other health care program.

(i) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that the director determines that it will not result in the loss of federal funds under the demonstration project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 213.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.252.

(a) In the event of a partial year extension of a demonstration project pursuant to this article, the director shall have discretion to determine allocations for the extension period on either an annual or partial year basis, consistent with any requirements in the letter from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services granting the extension.

(b) This section shall be implemented only
 to the extent federal financial participation is available and is not jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 714, Sec. 4.   (SB 208)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.25 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.    Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.253.

(a) If the department has not received adequate assurances from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) before November 1, 2015, that the department’s application for a subsequent demonstration project, as defined in subdivision (x) of Section 17612.2 and as submitted pursuant to Section 17612.8, is likely to be approved with an effective date of November 1, 2015, the director may request one or more temporary extensions, as necessary to continue the operation of, and the authorities provided under, the federal Medicaid demonstration project titled “California Bridge to Reform Demonstration” (waiver number 11-W-00193/9), until the approved effective date of the subsequent demonstration project.

(b) To the extent permitted under the terms of any approved temporary extension obtained by the department pursuant to subdivision (a), an approved subsequent demonstration project, or as otherwise permitted under federal Medicaid law, the department shall, after consulting with the affected designated public hospitals, extend and apply the payment methodologies and allocations described in this article and in effect during the successor demonstration project, on a state fiscal year, annual, partial year, or other basis, consistent with any applicable implementing provisions of the Medi-Cal state plan and requirements imposed by the CMS. The department may make payments on an interim basis and subject to reconciliation to amounts payable under the payment and allocation methodologies applicable to any approved temporary extension obtained by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) or approved subsequent demonstration project.

(c) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not jeopardized.

(d) Until July 1, 2016, in the event of a conflict between the terms of any federally approved extension obtained by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) and this article, the terms of the federally approved temporary extension shall control, and the department shall provide notice of the conflict to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar
 instructions without taking regulatory action until July 1, 2016.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 759, Sec. 1.   (SB 36)   Effective October 10, 2015.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.25 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.    Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.26.

(a) Unless this article is repealed pursuant to subdivision (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2, this article shall become inoperative on the date that the director executes a declaration, which shall be retained by the director and provided to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature, stating that the federal demonstration project or the successor demonstration project provided for
 in this article has been terminated by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, and shall, six months after the date the declaration is executed, be repealed.

(b) In addition to the requirements specified in subdivision (a), the director shall post the declaration on the department’s Internet Web site and the director shall send the declaration to the Secretary of State and the Legislative Counsel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 18.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Repealed on date prescribed by this section's own provisions or by subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Note: Termination clause affects Article 5.2, commencing with Section 14166.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.22. Quality Assurance Fee Act [14167.35. - 14167.37.]

14167.35.

(a) The Hospital Quality Assurance Revenue Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(b) (1) All fees required to be paid to the state pursuant to this article shall be paid in the form of remittances payable to the department.

(2) The department shall directly transmit the fee payments to the Treasurer to be deposited in the Hospital Quality Assurance Revenue Fund. Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, any interest and dividends earned on deposits in the fund shall be retained in the fund for purposes specified in subdivision (c).

(c) All funds in
 the Hospital Quality Assurance Revenue Fund, together with any interest and dividends earned on money in the fund, shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be used exclusively to enhance federal financial participation for hospital services under the Medi-Cal program, to provide additional reimbursement to, and to support quality improvement efforts of, hospitals, and to minimize uncompensated care provided by hospitals to uninsured patients, in the following order of priority:

(1) To pay for the department’s staffing and administrative costs directly attributable to implementing Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1) and this article, including any administrative fees that the director determines shall be paid to mental health plans pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14167.11 and repayment of the loan made to the department from the Private Hospital Supplemental Fund pursuant to the act that added this section.

(2) To pay for the health care coverage for children in the amount of eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) for each subject fiscal quarter for which payments are made under Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1).

(3) To make increased capitation payments to managed health care plans pursuant to Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1).

(4) To pay funds from the Hospital Quality Assurance Revenue Fund pursuant to Section 14167.5 that would have been used for grant payments and that are retained by the state, and to make increased payments to hospitals, including grants, pursuant to Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1), both of which shall be of equal priority.

(5) To make increased payments to mental health plans pursuant to Article
 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1).

(d) Any amounts of the quality assurance fee collected in excess of the funds required to implement subdivision (c), including any funds recovered under subdivision (d) of Section 14167.14 or subdivision (e) of Section 14167.36, shall be refunded to general acute care hospitals, pro rata with the amount of quality assurance fee paid by the hospital, subject to the limitations of federal law. If federal rules prohibit the refund described in this subdivision, the excess funds shall be deposited in the Distressed Hospital Fund to be used for the purposes described in Section 14166.23, and shall be supplemental to and not supplant existing funds.

(e) Any methodology or other provision specified in Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1) and this article may be modified by the department, in consultation with the hospital community, to
 the extent necessary to meet the requirements of federal law or regulations to obtain federal approval or to enhance the probability that federal approval can be obtained, provided the modifications do not violate the spirit and intent of Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1) or this article and are not inconsistent with the conditions of implementation set forth in Section 14167.36.

(f) The department, in consultation with the hospital community, shall make adjustments, as necessary, to the amounts calculated pursuant to Section 14167.32 in order to ensure compliance with the federal requirements set forth in Section 433.68 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations or elsewhere in federal law.

(g) The department shall request approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the implementation of this article. In making this request, the
 department shall seek specific approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to exempt providers identified in this article as exempt from the fees specified, including the submission, as may be necessary, of a request for waiver of the broad based requirement, waiver of the uniform fee requirement, or both, pursuant to paragraphs (e)(1) and (e)(2) of Section 433.68 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(h) (1) For purposes of this section, a modification pursuant to this section shall be implemented only if the modification, change, or adjustment does not do either of the following:

(A) Reduces or increases the supplemental payments or grants made under Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1) in the aggregate for the 2008–09, 2009–10, and 2010–11 federal fiscal years to a hospital by more than 2 percent of the amount
 that would be determined under this article without any change or adjustment.

(B) Reduces or increases the amount of the fee payable by a hospital in total under this article for the 2008–09, 2009–10, and 2010–11 federal fiscal years by more than 2 percent of the amount that would be determined under this article without any change or adjustment.

(2) The department shall provide the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature a status update of the implementation of Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1) and this article on January 1, 2010, and quarterly thereafter. Information on any adjustments or modifications to the provisions of this article or Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1) that may be required for federal approval shall be provided coincident with the consultation required under subdivisions
 (f) and (g).

(i) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this article or Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1) by means of provider bulletins, all plan letters, or other similar instruction, without taking regulatory action. The department shall also provide notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature within five working days when the above-described action is taken in order to inform the Legislature that the action is being implemented.

(j) Notwithstanding any law, the Controller may use the funds in the Hospital Quality Assurance Revenue Fund for cashflow loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code.

(k) Notwithstanding Sections 14167.17 and 14167.40, subdivisions (b) to (h), inclusive, shall become inoperative on January 1, 2013, subdivisions (a), (i), and (j) shall remain operative until January 1, 2018, and as of January 1, 2018, this section is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 4.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.   Subds. (b) through (h) became inoperative on January 1, 2013, as provided in subd. (k).   Repealed as of January 1, 2018, by its own provisions.\n   However, pursuant to Section 14169.75 as amended Nov. 8, 2016, by Prop. 52, this section is not repealed (and subds. (a), (i), (j), and (k) remain operative) for as long as Article 5.230 (comm. with Section 14169.50) is operative.)
-------------------------------------------

14167.37.

(a) (1) The department shall make available all public documentation it uses to administer and audit the program authorized under Article 5.230 (commencing with Section 14169.50) pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(2) In addition, upon request from a hospital, the department shall require Medi-Cal managed care plans to furnish hospitals with the amounts the plan intends to pay to the hospital pursuant to Article 5.230 (commencing with Section 14169.50). Nothing in this paragraph shall require the department to reconcile payments made to individual hospitals from
 Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department shall post all of the following on the department’s internet website:

(1) Within 10 business days after receipt of approval of the hospital quality assurance fee program under Article 5.230 (commencing with Section 14169.50) from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS), the hospital quality assurance fee final model and upper payment limit calculations.

(2) Quarterly updates on payments, fee schedules, and model updates when applicable.

(3) Within 10 business days after receipt, information on managed care rate approvals.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Fee schedules” mean the dates on which the hospital quality assurance fee will be due from the hospitals and the dates on which the department will submit fee-for-service payments to the hospitals. “Fee schedules” also include the dates on which the department is expected to submit payments to managed care plans.

(2) “Hospital quality assurance fee final model” means the spreadsheet calculating the supplemental amounts based on the upper payment limit calculation from claims and hospital data sources of days and hospital services once CMS approves the program under Article 5.230 (commencing with Section 14169.50).

(3) “Upper payment
 limit calculation” means the determination of the federal upper payment limit on the amount of the Medicaid payment for which federal financial participation is available for a class of service and a class of health care providers, as specified in Part 447 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and that has been approved by CMS.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 455.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.227. Hospital Quality Assurance Fee Act of 2011 [14168.31. - 14168.41.]

14168.31.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) (1) “Aggregate quality assurance fee” means, with respect to a hospital that is not a prepaid health plan hospital, the sum of all of the following:

(A) The annual
 fee-for-service days for an individual hospital multiplied by the fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate, divided by two.

(B) The annual managed care days for an individual hospital multiplied by the managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate, divided by two.

(C) The annual Medi-Cal days for an individual hospital multiplied by the Medi-Cal per diem quality assurance fee rate, divided by two.

(2) “Aggregate quality assurance fee” means, with respect to a hospital that is a prepaid health plan hospital, the sum of all of the following:

(A) The annual fee-for-service days for an individual hospital multiplied by the fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate, divided by two.

(B) The annual managed care days for an individual hospital multiplied by the prepaid health plan hospital managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate, divided by two.

(C) The annual Medi-Cal managed care days for an individual hospital multiplied by the prepaid health plan hospital Medi-Cal managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate, divided by two.

(D) The annual Medi-Cal fee-for-service days for an individual hospital multiplied by the Medi-Cal per diem quality assurance fee rate, divided by two.

(3) “Aggregate quality assurance fee after the application of the fee percentage” means the aggregate quality assurance fee multiplied by the fee percentage for the program period.

(b) “Annual fee-for-service days” means the number of
 fee-for-service days of each hospital subject to the quality assurance fee, as reported on the day’s data source.

(c) “Annual managed care days” means the number of managed care days of each hospital subject to the quality assurance fee, as reported on the day’s data source.

(d) “Annual Medi-Cal days” means the number of Medi-Cal days of each hospital subject to the quality assurance fee, as reported on the day’s data source.

(e) “Converted hospital” shall mean a hospital described in subdivision (b) of Section 14168.1.

(f) “Days data source” means the following:

(1) For a hospital that did not submit an Annual Financial Disclosure Report to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and
 Development for a fiscal year ending during 2007, but submitted that report for a fiscal period ending in 2008 that includes at least 10 months of 2007, the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by the hospital to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development for the fiscal period in 2008 that includes at least 10 months of 2007.

(2) For a hospital owned by Kaiser Foundation Hospitals that submitted corrections to reported patient days to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development for its fiscal year ending in 2007 before July 31, 2009, the corrected data.

(3) For all other hospitals, the hospital’s Annual Financial Disclosure Report in the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development files as of October 31, 2008, for its fiscal year ending during 2007.

(g) “Designated public
 hospital” shall have the meaning given in subdivision (d) of Section 14166.1 as of January 1, 2011.

(h) “Exempt facility” means any of the following:

(1) A public hospital, which shall include either of the following:

(A) A hospital, as defined in paragraph (25) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98.

(B) A tax-exempt nonprofit hospital that is licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code and operating a hospital owned by a local health care district, and is affiliated with the health care district hospital owner by means of the district’s status as the nonprofit corporation’s sole corporate member.

(2) With the exception of a hospital that is in the
 Charitable Research Hospital peer group, as set forth in the 1991 Hospital Peer Grouping Report published by the department, a hospital that is a hospital designated as a specialty hospital in the hospital’s Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development Hospital Annual Disclosure Report for the hospital’s fiscal year ending in the 2007 calendar year.

(3) A hospital that satisfies the Medicare criteria to be a long-term care hospital.

(4) A small and rural hospital as specified in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code designated as that in the hospital’s Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development Hospital Annual Disclosure Report for the hospital’s fiscal year ending in the 2007 calendar year.

(i) “Federal approval” means the last approval by the federal government required for the implementation
 of this article and Article 5.226 (commencing with Section 14168.1).

(j) (1) “Fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate” means a fixed daily fee on fee-for-service days.

(2) The fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate must be no greater than or equal to two hundred fifty-three dollars and twenty-nine cents ($253.29) per day.

(3) Upon federal approval or conditional federal approval described in Section 14168.34, the director shall determine the fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate based on the funds required to make the payments specified in Article 5.226 (commencing with Section 14168.1), in consultation with the hospital community.

(k) “Fee-for-service days” means inpatient hospital days where
 the service type is reported as “acute care,” “psychiatric care,” and “chemical dependency care and rehabilitation care,” and the payer category is reported as “Medicare traditional,” “county indigent programs-traditional,” “other third parties-traditional,” “other indigent,” and “other payers,” for purposes of the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by hospitals to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(l) “Fee percentage” means a fraction, expressed as a percentage, the numerator of which is the amount of payments for the program period under Sections 14168.2, 14168.3, and 14168.5, for which federal financial participation is available and the denominator of which is one billion eight hundred ninety nine million eight hundred eleven thousand one hundred eighty three dollars ($1,899,811,183).

(m) “General acute care hospital” means any hospital
 licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(n) “Hospital community” means any hospital industry organization or system that represents children’s hospitals, nondesignated public hospitals, designated public hospitals, private safety-net hospitals, and other public or private hospitals.

(o) “Managed care days” means inpatient hospital days where the service type is reported as “acute care,” “psychiatric care,” and “chemical dependency care and rehabilitation care,” and the payer category is reported as “Medicare managed care,” “county indigent programs-managed care,” and “other third parties-managed care,” for purposes of the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by hospitals to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(p) “Managed care per diem quality
 assurance fee rate” means a fixed fee on managed care days of twenty-seven dollars and twenty-five cents ($27.25) per day.

(q) “Medi-Cal days” means inpatient hospital days where the service type is reported as “acute care,” “psychiatric care,” and “chemical dependency care and rehabilitation care,” and the payer category is reported as “Medi-Cal traditional” and “Medi-Cal managed care,” for purposes of the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by hospitals to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(r) “Medi-Cal fee-for-service days” means inpatient hospital days where the service type is reported as “acute care,” “psychiatric care,” and “chemical dependency care and rehabilitation care,” and the payer category is reported as “Medi-Cal traditional” for purposes of the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by hospitals to the Office of Statewide
 Health Planning and Development.

(s) “Medi-Cal managed care days” means inpatient hospital days as reported on the days data source where the service type is reported as “acute care,” “psychiatric care,” and “chemical dependency care and rehabilitation care,” and the payer category is reported as “Medi-Cal managed care” for purposes of the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by hospitals to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(t) “Medi-Cal per diem quality assurance fee rate” means a fixed fee on Medi-Cal days of two hundred seventy-five dollars ($275) per day.

(u) “New hospital” means a hospital operation, business, or facility functioning under current or prior ownership as a private hospital that does not have a days data source or a hospital that has a days data source in whole, or